Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1642.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-121, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-121. Number of judges; petition for approval of additional judges; additional method A. In each county of the state there shall be a superior court for which at least one judge shall be elected. In each county having a census enumeration greater than thirty thousand inhabitants, and upon on petition by the board of supervisors of such county to the governor and his the governor's approval thereof, there shall be an additional judge of the superior court for each thirty thousand inhabitants, or majority fraction thereof, or the additional judge of the superior court may be authorized, based on the procedure prescribed by the terms of subsections B and C of this section. B. Upon On petition by the board of supervisors of a county to the governor and his the governor's approval thereof, there shall be an additional judge of the superior court provided that the board of supervisors has determined, as prescribed in subsection C of this section, that the county has acquired since the last census enumeration the required number of inhabitants for an additional judge as provided in subsection A of this section. C. The determination of the board of supervisors shall be based on, but not limited to, recent estimates of population, if any, of any area within the county issued by the united states census bureau of the census, auto registrations, nonagricultural employment, gross utility revenues and retail sales. D. Additional judges authorized by the terms of this section shall be appointed or elected as provided by law. END_STATUTE